dictsource/pt_rules
// Portuguese Translation Rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Options
// ?1  European Portuguese
// ?2  Brazilian Portuguese
// ?3  Epenthetic [I] between consonants (used to avoid bad diphones in Brazilian MBROLA voices)
// ?4  MBROLA ajustments (used to modify nasal vowels, modify diphthongs, and for other adaptations in MBrola voices)


// Letter groups
// A  a vowel, plus y
// C  a consonant
// B  a consonant, except h l r w y (excludes the second letter in consonant clusters and semivowels)
// H  a consonant, except l m n r s w y (excludes common letters in syllable coda and semivowels)
// F  a voiceless consonant: p, t, k...
// G  a voiced consonant: b, d, g...
// Y  a front vowel: e, i, y

// Special characters
// +  increase the score by 20 points
// D  the character is a digit
// K  the character is not a vowel, i.e. anything alse, including nothing
// N  use the rule if the word doesn't have a suffix
// W  use the rule when spelling letter by letter
// Pn the n characters is a prefix
// Sn the n characters is a suffix

// endings
.L01 a am
.L02 e em
.L03 a am o
.L04 a am e em o ue uem
.L05 r ra ram re rem rde rmo
.L06 r ra ram ste sse ssem re rem rmo
.L07 sse ssem ste
.L08 a o
.L09 p b t d k g f v c j q x
.L10 bt ck ct ff ft ll pf ph pt rm rn sh ss th


// Normalize Unicode Latin-1 Supplement.
// Languages such as PT, ES, FR, DE etc.
// www.unicode.org/charts/PDF/U0080.pdf
// www.unicode.org/charts/PDF/U0300.pdf
.replace
à	à	// a + U+0300 = U+00E0
è	è	// e + U+0300 = U+00E8
ì	ì	// i + U+0300 = U+00EC
ò	ò	// o + U+0300 = U+00F2
ù	ù	// u + U+0300 = U+00F9

á	á	// a + U+0301 = U+00E1
é	é	// e + U+0301 = U+00E9
í	í	// i + U+0301 = U+00ED
ó	ó	// o + U+0301 = U+00F3
ú	ú	// u + U+0301 = U+00FA

â	â	// a + U+0302 = U+00E2
ê	ê	// e + U+0302 = U+00EA
î	î	// i + U+0302 = U+00EE
ô	ô	// o + U+0302 = U+00F4
û	û	// u + U+0302 = U+00FB

ä	ä	// a + U+0308 = U+00E4
ë	ë	// e + U+0308 = U+00EB
ï	ï	// i + U+0308 = U+00EF
ö	ö	// o + U+0308 = U+00F6
ü	ü	// u + U+0308 = U+00FC

ç	ç	// c + U+0327 = U+00E7
ã	ã	// a + U+0303 = U+00E3
õ	õ	// o + U+0303 = U+00F5

å	å	// a + U+030A = U+00E5
ñ	ñ	// n + U+0303 = U+00F1
ý	ý	// y + U+0301 = U+00FD
ÿ	ÿ	// y + U+0308 = U+00FF


.group a
        a          a
     &) a (_       =&        // in final unstressed syllable
     &) a (s_      =&
   A_l) a (_       &
     &) a (_à      =&/
?1      a (_       =&        // in final unstressed syllable
?1      a (s_      =&
?1      a (_a      =&/       // ?? elide final a before a
?1      a (_à      =&/

?1   p) a (d_      =E
?1      a (l_      'A        // eg: Portugal, capital, etc.
?1      a (lK      ,A        // Algarve, Almerinda, etc...
?2      al (_      aU
?2      al (B      aU
?2      al (_A     aw
?2      al (_hA    aw
        a (lh+     a
        a (ll+     a
        all (K     al#
        a (m       &~
        a (mAr_    &
        a (mA@     &
        a (n       &~
        a (ñ       &~
        a (nA@     &
        a (nAr_    &

     @) am (_      =&U~
        am (_      &~N
        am (b      &~N
        am (p      &~N
        an (K      &~N

?4   @) am (_      =&~w/
?4      am (_      &~
?4      am (b      &~
?4      am (p      &~
?4      an (K      &~

        anh (A     &~n^
        a (mmA     &~
        a (nnA     &~

?1   C) acç        'a's      // eg: selecção, etc...

        a (iu_     a         // caiu
        a (iCK     a

        ai         aI
        ai (A      aj;
        ai (s      aI
        ay         aI
        ay (A      aj;

?4      ai         aj/
?4      ai (s      aj/
?4      ay         aj/

    pl) ay         eI
?4  pl) ay         ej/

        ao (_      aU
        au         aU
        au (A      aw
        au (s      aU
        au (_A     aw
        au (_hA    aw
        au (CK     aU

?4      ao (_      aw/
?4      au         aw/
?4      au (s      aw/
?4      au (_A     aw/
?4      au (_hA    aw/
?4      au (CK     aw/

?4      aun (K     aUN
?4      aul (K     awl/
?4      aur (K     awr/

    âB) a (C@      &
   âBC) a (C@      &
    êC) a (C@      &
   êCC) a (C@      &
    ôB) a (C@      &
   ôBC) a (C@      &
    áC) a (C@      &
   áCC) a (C@      &
    éC) a (C@      &
   éCC) a (C@      &
     í) a (CA_     &
    íC) a (C@      &
   íCC) a (C@      &
    óC) a (C@      &
   óCC) a (C@      &
    úC) a (C@      &
   úCC) a (C@      &
        ation (_   'eIS&~N
 _infr) a (sso     &
 _infr) a (vermelho &
 _ultr) a (leve_   &
 _ultr) a (sso     &
 _ultr) a (violeta_ &

     _) anti (@@   ,&~Nt#i
     _) anti (-    ,&~Nt#%i
     _) anti (_    '&~Nt#%i

?1   _) auto (@@   ,aUt%O
?1   _) auto (grA  ,aUtu     // autografar
?1   _) auto (mAb  ,aUtu     // automobilismo
?1   _) auto (mAçA ,aUtu     // automação
?1   _) auto (mAt  ,aUtu     // automático
?1   _) auto (mAv  ,aUtu     // automóvel
?1   _) auto (nAm  ,aUtu     // autonomia
?1   _) auto (ram  ,aUtu     // autorama
?1   _) auto (ri   ,aUtu     // autorizar
?1   _) auto (-    ,aUt%O
?1   _) auto (-de- ,aU%tU    // auto-de-fé
?2   _) auto (-    ,aUt%o

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
     _) a (HC_     ,a
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
   _CB) a (_       'a


.group â
        â          ''&
        â (m       ''&~
        â (n       ''&~

        âm (_      ''&~N
        âm (b      ''&~N
        âm (p      ''&~N
        ân (K      ''&~N

?4      âm (_      ''&~
?4      âm (b      ''&~
?4      âm (p      ''&~
?4      ân (K      ''&~

        ânh (A     ''&~n^


.group à
        à          a
     _) às (_      ,a:s#
     _) às (_A     ,a:z
?1   _) às (_G     ,a:Z
?2   _) às (_G     ,a:z
        à (m       &~
        à (n       &~

        ành (A     &~n^

?1      à (@       ,A          // secondary stress in adverbs with -mente (to be used internally only, orthographically outdated, do not confuse with crasis)
?2      à (@       ,a
        à (nA      ,&~
        à (mA      ,&~
        àn (K      ,&~N
        àm (K      ,&~N
        àl (K      ,Al#

.group á
        á          ''a
        ái         ''aI
        ái (s      ''aI
        á (iCK     ''a
        áy         ''aI
?1      ál (B      ''Al
?2      ál (B      ''aU
        áu         ''aU
        áu (s      ''aU
        á (uCK     ''a

        ám (_      ''&~N
        ám (b      ''&~N
        ám (p      ''&~N
        án (K      ''&~N

?4      ám (_      ''&~
?4      ám (b      ''&~
?4      ám (p      ''&~
?4      án (K      ''&~


.group ã
        ã          &~
        ão         &U~
?4      ão         &~w/
        ãe         &~j
?4      ãe         &~j/


.group b
        b          b
        b (b+ 

?1   A) b (A       B
?1   A) b (rA      B
?1   A) b (lA      B

?3   @) b (B       bI/
?3   @) b (_       bI/

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) b (B+      b,e       // BZip

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) b (C_      b,e
   _AH) b (_       b'e
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) b (BA_     b,e
    _C) b (A_      b,e


.group c
        c          k
        c (c+ 
        c (Y       s         // ce ci
     @) c (cY@     k         // cce cci
     @) c (cYCK    k         // access, accept
        ch         S

?1   @) c (cY+               // drop “c” in European Portuguese (eg: seleccionar)
?1   A) ct         t         // drop “c” in European Portuguese (eg: exacto)
?1   A) cç         s         // drop “c” in European Portuguese (eg: selecção)
?1 conta) ct (A    kt        // eg: contacto, contactar, contactável, incontactável, etc...

?3   @) c (B       kI/
?3   @) c (_       kI/

        chr        k*        // Christian (English)
        cch        k         // Pinocchio (Italian)
    @!) cci (_     =si       // Italian immigrants
     @) c (k+                // Jack, acknowledge (English)
     @) c (q+                // Jacques, acquisition (French)

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) c (B+      s,e       // CCleaner
     _) c (ni+     kI/       // cnidário
     _) c (z+      k         // czarina

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) c (C_      s,e
   _AH) c (_       s'e
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) c (BA_     s,e
    _C) c (A_      s,e

.group d
        d          d
?2      d (_       d#
?2      d (i       d#
?2      d (í       d#
?2      d (ì       d#
?2      d (Y_      d#
        d (d+ 

?1   A) d (A       D
?1   A) d (rA      D
?1   A) d (lA      D

?3   @) d (B       dI/
?3   @) d (_       dI/

?2   A) de (o_     dZj
     A) dg (Y      dZ        // gadget, pidgin (English)

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) d (B+      d,e       // DBus
     _) d (jA+     dI/       // Djalma

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) d (C_      d,e
   _AH) d (_       d'e
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) d (BA_     d,e
    _C) d (A_      d,e


.group e
        e          e
     @) e (_       =y
     @) e (s_      =y
?1   @) e (_iN     =i/       // drop final [i] is next word starts with another i

?1      e (e       i         // eg: candeeiro
?1      e (em_     e         // eg: creem, leem, veem

?2      el (_      Ew
?2      el (B      EU
?2      el (B$w_alt2 eU
?2      el (_A     Ew
?2      el (_hA    Ew

        e (lh+     e
        e (ll+     E
        ell (K     El#

        et (_      Et#

        e (L09_    E         // unicef, opep, pet, ed...
        e (rL09_   E         // nerd, expert, uerj...
        e (sL09_   E         // best, telesp, udesc...
        e (L10_    E         // beth, jeff, steph...

        e (bL02_   E
        e (cL04_   E
    @c) e (L07_    e
        e (cCL04_  E
     r) e (cho_    e

        e (dL02_   E

        e (fL04_   E

        e (gL04_   E

        e (grL04_  E

     h) e (gL04_   e

        e (lL04_   E
     C) e (pL04_   E
        e (ptL04_  E
     i) e (r_      E

    qu) e (r_      E

    ib) e (rL04_   E
     d) e (rL04_   E
    eb) e (L07_    e         // recebeste, etc.
    ed) e (rL04_   e
    eg) e (L07_    e         // elegeste, etc.
   _@o) e (L07_    e         // doeste, etc.
    iv) e (rL04_   E
   pod) e (rA_     e
    @s) e (L05_    E
     f) e (rL04_   E
     n) e (rL04_   E
     p) e (rL04_   E
        e (quL02_  E
        e (rbL04_  E
        e (rgL04_  E
        e (rquL02_ E
        e (rsL04_  E
        e (scL02_  E
        e (sL02_   E
        e (ssL04_  E
        e (ss_     E         // stress and english words
?2   v) ee (@      ee        // veemente
?2   C) ee (_      i
?2      ee (C_     i
?2   C) e (em_     e
        e (stL04_  E
        e (strL04_ E
        e (rme_    E
        e (rnL04_  E
        e (rtL04_  E
        e (rrL04_  E
        e (rvL04_  E
        e (tL04_   E
        e (trL04_  E
     m) e (tL03_   e
    An) e (tA_     e
    on) e (te_     E
     u) e (ta_     e
        e (vL04_   E
     t) e (ve_     e

    _r) eu (n      eu

        e (x_      E
        e (xL04_   E

        em (b      e~N
        em (p      e~N
        en (C      e~N

//?2   _) em (b@     eIN
//?2   _) em (p@     eIN
//?2   _) en (C@     eIN
//?2  _C) em (b@     eIN
//?2  _C) em (p@     eIN
//?2  _C) en (C@     eIN
//?2 _CC) em (b@     eIN
//?2 _CC) em (p@     eIN
//?2 _CC) en (C@     eIN

?4      em (b      e~
?4      em (p      e~
?4      en (C      e~

        em (_      =eIN
        en (_      =eIN
        en (s_     =eIN

?4      em (_      =e~j/
?4      en (_      =e~j/
?4      en (s_     =e~j/

        ein (_     eIN
?4      ein (_     e~j/

        enh (A     en^
        e (mmA     e
        e (nnA     e

        e (iCK     e
        e (uCK     e

        ei         eI
        ei (A      ej;
        ei (s      eI
        ei ($w_alt EI
        ey         eI
        ey (A      ej;

?4      ei         ej/
?4      ei (s      ej/
?4      ei ($w_alt Ej/
?4      ey         ej/

        eu         eU
        eu (A      ew
        eu (s      eU
        eu (_A     ew
        eu (_hA    ew

?4      eu         ew/
?4      eu (s      ew/
?4      eu (_A     ew/
?4      eu (_hA    ew/
